Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3601
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 76-3601 to 76-3606:

(1) Home inspection means the process by which a home inspector examines the observable systems and components of improvements to residential real property that are readily accessible to such inspector;

(2) Home inspector means a person who, for compensation, conducts a home inspection; and

(3) Residential real property means a structure used or intended to be used as a residence and consisting of one to four family dwelling units.

Laws 2021, LB423, § 1.